Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 76.2 Alcohol And/or Drug Use Amnesty for Reporters of Incidents of Violence at Institutions of Higher Education

16-76.2-1.
“Incident of violence” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “incident of violence” shall include any event or occurrence where any person abuses or causes physical injury to another person, or threatens to abuse or to cause physical injury to another person. Incidents of violence shall include, but not be limited to, domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, and sexual assault.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 431, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 432, § 1.

16-76.2-2.
Policies for drug/alcohol amnesty for individuals reporting incidents of violence.

Every institution of higher education in the state shall adopt and implement the following policy as part of its code of conduct:

“The health and safety of every student at the (name of institution) is of utmost importance. (Name of institution) recognizes that students who have been drinking and/or using drugs (whether such use is voluntary or involuntary) at the time that an incident of violence occurs, including, but not limited to, domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual assault may be hesitant to report such incidents due to fear of potential consequences for their own conduct. (Name of institution) strongly encourages students to report incidents of violence to institution officials. A bystander acting in good faith, or a reporting individual acting in good faith, who discloses any incident of violence to (name of institution)’s officials or law enforcement will not be subject to (name of institution)’s code of conduct action for violations of alcohol- and/or drug-use policies occurring at or near the time of the commission of the incident of violence.”

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit an institution’s ability to provide amnesty in additional circumstances.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 431, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 432, § 1.